Hawaii statutes.
§471-9 Licenses. (a) Except as otherwise
provided in this chapter, the board of veterinary examiners shall issue a
license to engage in the practice of veterinary medicine to all persons meeting
the requirements of this chapter upon payment of a license fee.

(b) All licenses issued by the board shall
expire on June 30 of each even-numbered year next following the date of
issuance. Failure to renew the license on or before June 30 of each
even-numbered year shall automatically constitute a forfeiture of the license;
provided that the license shall be restored upon the submission of a written
application, a renewal fee, a penalty fee, and proof of completing the
applicable continuing education credits to the board.

(c) Prior to the June 30, 2016, payment
deadline for license renewal, and prior to every license renewal thereafter, a
licensee shall:

(1) Pay all required fees; and

(2) Complete at least twenty credit hours of
continuing education within the two-year period preceding the renewal date.

(d) A licensee who has graduated from an
accredited veterinary school within one year of the licensee's first license
renewal shall not be subject to the continuing education requirement for the
first license renewal.

(e) Each licensee shall be responsible for
maintaining the licensee's continuing education records. At the time of
renewal, each licensee shall certify under oath that the licensee has complied
with the continuing education requirement of this section. The board may
require a licensee to submit, in addition to the certification, evidence
satisfactory to the board that demonstrates compliance with the continuing
education requirement of this section.

(f) The board may conduct random audits of
licensees to determine compliance with the continuing education requirement.
The board shall provide written notice of an audit to a licensee randomly
selected for audit. Within sixty days of notification, the licensee shall
provide the board with documentation verifying compliance with the continuing
education requirement established by this section.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision, no
license shall expire while the licensee is serving on active duty in the armed
forces of the United States during any emergency declared by the President or Congress
and six months after the termination thereof. [L 1949, c 280, pt of §1; RL
1955, §73-9; am L 1961, c 142, §9(b); HRS §471-9; am L 1975, c 118, §34; am L
1984, c 7, §77; am L 2012, c 306, §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next